Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB717.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 9 TLSB 6836YC (4) 91 jda/jh H.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 SCHOOL BOARD AND OFFICERS ââ DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES 2 Section 1. Section 24.2A, subsection 4, paragraph b, 3 subparagraph (3), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 4 (3) If the political subdivision is a school district, 5 notice of the public hearing shall be published not less 6 than ten nor more than twenty days prior to the hearing in 7 a newspaper published in the school district, if any, and if 8 not, then in a newspaper of general circulation in the school 9 district ; provided, however, that if the school district has a 10 certified enrollment of less than or equal to one thousand two 11 hundred students in the current school year, then the school 12 district may instead publish notice of the public hearing not 13 less than ten nor more than twenty days prior to the hearing 14 on the school districtâs internet site, in each attendance 15 center within the school district, and in the school districtâs 16 central administrative office if the central administrative 17 office is not an attendance center . 18 Sec. 2. Section 257.18, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 19 to read as follows: 20 1. An instructional support program that provides 21 additional funding for school districts is established. A 22 board of directors that wishes to consider participating in 23 the instructional support program shall hold a public hearing 24 on the question of participation. The board shall set forth 25 its proposal, including the method that will be used to fund 26 the program, in a resolution and shall publish the notice of 27 the time and place of a public hearing on the resolution. 28 Notice of the time and place of the public hearing shall be 29 published not less than ten nor more than twenty days before 30 the public hearing in a newspaper which is a newspaper of 31 general circulation in the school district. At the hearing, 32 or no later than thirty days after the date of the hearing, the 33 board shall take action to adopt a resolution to participate 34 in the instructional support program that describes the 35 -1- LSB 6836YC (4) 91 jda/jh 1/ 18 H.F. _____ method that will be used to fund the instructional support 1 program for a period not exceeding five years or to direct 2 the county commissioner of elections to submit the question 3 of participation in the program for a period not exceeding 4 ten years to the registered voters of the school district 5 at an election held on a date specified in section 39.2, 6 subsection 4 , paragraph âcâ . If the board submits the question 7 at an election and a majority of those voting on the question 8 favors participation in the program, the board shall adopt 9 a resolution to participate and certify the results of the 10 election to the department of management. 11 Sec. 3. Section 257.29, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 12 to read as follows: 13 1. An educational improvement program is established to 14 provide additional funding for school districts in which 15 the regular program district cost per pupil for a budget 16 year is one hundred ten percent of the regular program state 17 cost per pupil for the budget year and which have approved 18 the use of the instructional support program established in 19 section 257.18 . A board of directors that wishes to consider 20 participating in the educational improvement program shall hold 21 a hearing on the question of participation and the maximum 22 percent of the regular program district cost of the district 23 that will be used. The hearing shall be held in the manner 24 provided in section 257.18 , Code 2026, for the instructional 25 support program. Following the hearing, the board may direct 26 the county commissioner of elections to submit the question to 27 the registered voters of the school district at an election 28 held on a date specified in section 39.2, subsection 4 , 29 paragraph âcâ . If a majority of those voting on the question 30 favors participation in the program, the board shall adopt a 31 resolution to participate and shall certify the results of the 32 election to the department of management and the district shall 33 participate in the program. If a majority of those voting on 34 the question does not favor participation, the district shall 35 -2- LSB 6836YC (4) 91 jda/jh 2/ 18 H.F. _____ not participate in the program. 1 Sec. 4. Section 279.6, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 2026, 2 is amended to read as follows: 3 a. Except as provided in paragraph âbâ and subsection 4 2 , vacancies occurring among the officers or members of a 5 school board shall be filled by the board by appointment. A 6 person so appointed to fill a vacancy in an elective office 7 shall hold office until a successor is elected and qualified 8 at the next regular school election, unless there is an 9 intervening special election for the school district, in which 10 event a successor shall be elected at the intervening special 11 election, in accordance with section 69.12 . To fill a vacancy 12 occurring among the members of a school board, the board shall 13 publish notice on the boardâs internet site and in the manner 14 prescribed by section 279.36 , stating that the board intends to 15 fill the vacancy by appointment but that the electors of the 16 school district have the right to file a petition requiring 17 that the vacancy be filled by a special election conducted 18 pursuant to section 279.7 . The board may publish notice in 19 advance if a member of the board submits a resignation to take 20 effect at a future date. The board may make an appointment to 21 fill the vacancy after the notice is published or after the 22 vacancy occurs, whichever is later. 23 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 279.8C Board of directors ââ access 24 to information. 25 1. The board of directors of a school district shall have 26 access to and may review any of the following: 27 a. The curriculum associated with any instruction provided 28 to students enrolled in the school district. 29 b. Materials located in a library operated by the school 30 district, including a library located in a classroom. 31 2. A school district shall not prohibit a member of the 32 board of directors of the school district from attending 33 classes taught by teachers employed by the school district 34 to observe classroom instruction, not for the purpose of 35 -3- LSB 6836YC (4) 91 jda/jh 3/ 18 H.F. _____ evaluation, if the member has provided reasonable prior notice 1 to the superintendent and principal of the attendance center 2 in which the classes are taught and to the teacher providing 3 the instruction. 4 3. a. A school district shall not prohibit a member of 5 the board of directors of the school district from accessing 6 materials used in a professional development program that 7 the school district, or an administrator employed by the 8 school district, requires employees of the school district to 9 attend. This paragraph shall not be construed to authorize 10 a member of the board of directors of the school district to 11 access an individual teacher professional development plan 12 developed pursuant to section 284.6 or any materials related 13 to an intensive assistance program a teacher is required to 14 participate in pursuant to section 284.8. 15 b. A school district, or an administrator employed by the 16 school district, shall provide copies of materials used in a 17 professional development program that the school district, or 18 an administrator employed by the school district, requires 19 employees of the school district to attend to a member of the 20 board of directors of the school district upon request. This 21 paragraph shall not be construed to require a school district, 22 or an administrator employed by the school district, to provide 23 copies of an individual teacher professional development plan 24 developed pursuant to section 284.6, or any materials related 25 to an intensive assistance program a teacher is required to 26 participate in pursuant to section 284.8, to a member of the 27 board of directors of the school district. 28 4. For purposes of this section, âprofessional development 29 programâ means the same as defined in section 256.145. 30 Sec. 6. Section 279.20, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 31 to read as follows: 32 2. The board of directors of a school district may delegate 33 the authority to hire support personnel and sign the support 34 personnel employment contracts, if applicable, if the board 35 -4- LSB 6836YC (4) 91 jda/jh 4/ 18 H.F. _____ adopts a policy authorizing the superintendent to perform 1 such duties and specifying the positions the superintendent 2 is authorized to fill. The board of directors of a school 3 district and the superintendent, if authorized pursuant to 4 this subsection, may use electronic signatures and electronic 5 contracts pursuant to chapter 554D and facsimile signatures 6 when entering into the contracts described in this subsection. 7 For purposes of this subsection , the term âsupport personnelâ 8 includes, but is not limited to, bus drivers, custodians, 9 educational associates, and clerical and food service 10 employees. 11 Sec. 7. Section 279.35, Code 2026, is amended to read as 12 follows: 13 279.35 Publication of proceedings. 14 1. The proceedings of each regular, adjourned, or special 15 meeting of the board, including the schedule of bills allowed, 16 shall be published after the adjournment of the meeting in 17 the manner provided in this section and section 279.36 , and 18 the publication of the schedule of the bills allowed shall 19 must include a list of claims allowed , including salary claims 20 for services performed . The schedule of bills allowed may 21 be published on a once monthly basis in lieu of publication 22 with the proceedings of each meeting of the board. The list 23 of claims allowed shall must include the name of the person 24 or firm making the claim , the purpose of the claim, and 25 the amount of the claim. If the purpose for the claims is 26 the same, two Two or more claims made by the same vendor, 27 supplier, or claimant may be consolidated if the number of 28 claims consolidated and the total consolidated claim amount are 29 listed in the statement. However, the board shall provide at 30 its office upon request an unconsolidated list of all claims 31 allowed. 32 2. Salaries paid to individuals regularly employed by the 33 district shall only be published annually on the districtâs 34 internet site and the publication shall must include the total 35 -5- LSB 6836YC (4) 91 jda/jh 5/ 18 H.F. _____ amount of the annual salary of each employee and must remain 1 on the districtâs internet site for at least thirty days 2 after publication . The secretary shall furnish a copy of the 3 proceedings to be published publish a link to the publication 4 within two weeks following the adjournment of the meeting. The 5 link must be prominently displayed on the districtâs internet 6 site. 7 Sec. 8. Section 279.41, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 8 to read as follows: 9 2. Notwithstanding subsection 1 , the board of directors 10 of a school corporation may take action to deposit moneys 11 received as provided in subsection 1 in any account maintained 12 by the school corporation after holding a public hearing on the 13 proposed action of the board . The board shall publish notice 14 of the time and place of the public hearing in the same manner 15 as required in section 24.9 . 16 Sec. 9. Section 280.12, subsections 2 and 3, Code 2026, 17 are amended by striking the subsections and inserting in lieu 18 thereof the following: 19 2. Utilize the recommendations of the school improvement 20 advisory committee to determine school district or accredited 21 nonpublic school needs, including but not limited to all of the 22 following: 23 a. Major educational needs. 24 b. Student learning goals. 25 c. Long-range and annual improvement goals. 26 d. Desired levels of student performance. 27 e. Harassment or bullying prevention goals. 28 3. Monitor school district and accredited nonpublic school 29 progress toward meeting the goals described in subsection 2. 30 Sec. 10. Section 291.1, Code 2026, is amended to read as 31 follows: 32 291.1 President ââ duties. 33 The president of the board of directors shall preside at 34 all of its meetings, sign all contracts made by the board, and 35 -6- LSB 6836YC (4) 91 jda/jh 6/ 18 H.F. _____ appear on behalf of the corporation in all actions brought 1 by or against it, unless individually a party, in which case 2 this duty shall be performed by the secretary. The president 3 or the presidentâs designee shall have the authority to enter 4 into original contracts or electronic contracts pursuant 5 to chapter 554D and sign, using an original or signature, 6 facsimile signature, or an electronic signature, as defined 7 in section 554D.103, all school district payments drawn and 8 authorize electronic funds transfers as provided by law. The 9 board of directors, by resolution, may designate an individual, 10 who shall not be the secretary, to sign payments or authorize 11 electronic funds transfers on behalf of the president pursuant 12 to this section . 13 DIVISION II 14 BOND SALES 15 Sec. 11. Section 75.2, Code 2026, is amended to read as 16 follows: 17 75.2 Notice of sale. 18 When public bonds are offered for sale, the official in 19 charge of the bond issue shall , by advertisement published 20 at least once, the last one of which shall be not less than 21 four nor more than twenty days before the sale in a newspaper 22 located in the county or a county contiguous to the place of 23 sale, give notice of the time and place of sale of the bonds, 24 the amount to be offered for sale, and any further information 25 which the official deems pertinent by publishing the time and 26 place of sale of the bonds, the amount to be offered for sale, 27 and any additional information the official deems pertinent 28 to the bond issue not less than four nor more than twenty 29 days before the sale in at least one electronic or written 30 publication with nationwide circulation that is recognized for 31 providing information regarding the sale of public bonds or in 32 a newspaper located in the county or a county contiguous to the 33 place of sale . 34 Sec. 12. Section 75.14, Code 2026, is amended to read as 35 -7- LSB 6836YC (4) 91 jda/jh 7/ 18 H.F. _____ follows: 1 75.14 Electronic bidding. 2 Notwithstanding contrary provisions of this chapter , 3 including section 75.3, a public body authorized to issue 4 bonds, notes, or other obligations may elect to receive bids to 5 purchase such bonds, notes, or other obligations by means of 6 electronic, internet or wireless communication; a proprietary 7 bidding procedure or system; or by facsimile transmission 8 to a location deemed appropriate by the governing body, in 9 each instance as may be approved by the governing body and 10 provided for in the notice of sale. An electronic bid shall 11 be submitted in substantial conformity with the requirements 12 of chapter 554D and any rules adopted pursuant to that chapter 13 with respect to the acceptance of electronic records by a 14 governmental agency. Additionally, before approving the use 15 of an electronic bidding procedure, the public body shall find 16 and determine that the specific procedure to be used will 17 provide reasonable security and maintain the integrity of 18 the competitive bidding process, and facilitate the delivery 19 of bids by interested parties under the circumstances of the 20 particular sale. 21 DIVISION III 22 SCHOOL DISTRICT FUNDS 23 Sec. 13. Section 298A.2, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 24 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 25 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (02) Teacher salary supplement funds 26 received under section 257.10, subsection 9. 27 Sec. 14. Section 298A.2, subsection 2, paragraph d, Code 28 2026, is amended to read as follows: 29 d. Expenditures from the flexibility account shall be 30 approved by resolution of the board of directors of the school 31 corporation and shall be included in the budget certified in 32 accordance with chapter 24 . Before the board of directors 33 may adopt the resolution approving expenditures from the 34 flexibility account, the board shall hold a public hearing on 35 -8- LSB 6836YC (4) 91 jda/jh 8/ 18 H.F. _____ the proposed resolution. The proposed resolution must state 1 the original source and purpose of the funds, the proposed use 2 of such funds, the amount of the proposed expenditure, and 3 the fiscal year from which the transfer of such funds to the 4 flexibility account occurred. The proposed resolution must 5 also include a certification that the statutory requirements 6 for each original source of the money proposed to be used have 7 been met, have been repealed, or are no longer in effect. The 8 board shall publish notice of the time and the place of the 9 public hearing in the same manner as required in section 24.9 . 10 The department of education shall prescribe the form for public 11 hearing notices. A copy of the resolution shall be provided 12 by the board to the department of education and shall be made 13 available by the board for any audit performed under chapter 14 11 . 15 Sec. 15. Section 298A.12, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 16 amended to read as follows: 17 2. If the sum of the fees collected under section 279.49 for 18 participation in a before and after school program and other 19 moneys deposited in the fund as the result of the before and 20 after school program exceeds the amount necessary to operate 21 the before and after school program, the excess amount may , 22 following a public hearing, be transferred by resolution of 23 the board of directors of the school corporation for deposit 24 in the general fund of the school corporation to be used for 25 school district general fund purposes. The board shall publish 26 notice of the time and the place of the public hearing in 27 the same manner as required in section 24.9 . The resolution 28 transferring the excess amount shall state the original source 29 and purpose of the funds, the method used to establish fee 30 amounts for the before and after school program under section 31 279.49, subsection 4 , the proposed use of such funds, and the 32 amount of the transfer. The department of education shall 33 prescribe the form for public hearing notices. The board shall 34 provide a copy of the resolution to the department of education 35 -9- LSB 6836YC (4) 91 jda/jh 9/ 18 H.F. _____ and shall make the resolution available for any audit performed 1 under chapter 11 . A transfer under this subsection does not 2 increase a school districtâs authorized expenditures as defined 3 in section 257.7 . 4 DIVISION IV 5 STATEWIDE SCHOOL INFRASTRUCTURE FUNDING 6 Sec. 16. Section 423F.3, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 7 to read as follows: 8 4. The revenues received pursuant to this chapter shall 9 be expended for the purposes specified in the revenue purpose 10 statement. If a board of directors has not approved a revenue 11 purpose statement, the revenues shall be expended in the order 12 listed in subsection 1 except that the payment of bonds for 13 which the revenues have been pledged shall be paid first. 14 Once approved, a revenue purpose statement is effective until 15 amended or repealed by the foregoing procedures. A revenue 16 purpose statement shall not be amended or repealed to reduce 17 the amount of revenue pledged to the payment of principal and 18 interest on bonds as long as any bonds authorized by sections 19 423E.5 and 423F.4 are outstanding unless funds sufficient 20 to pay principal, interest, and premium, if any, on the 21 outstanding obligations at or prior to maturity have been 22 properly set aside and pledged for that purpose. A school 23 district affected by a reorganization under chapter 275 that 24 has issued bonds under section 423E.5, Code 2023, or section 25 423F.4 and that has not approved a revenue purpose statement 26 shall first use revenues to make timely and sufficient payment 27 of principal and interest, and premium if applicable, on the 28 outstanding bonds. 29 Sec. 17. Section 423F.4, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 30 2026, is amended to read as follows: 31 a. Bonds issued on or after July 1, 2019, shall not be 32 sold at public sale as provided in chapter 75 , or at a private 33 sale, without notice and hearing. Notice of the time and 34 place of the public hearing shall be published not less than 35 -10- LSB 6836YC (4) 91 jda/jh 10/ 18 H.F. _____ ten four nor more than twenty days before the public hearing 1 in a newspaper which is a newspaper of general circulation 2 in the school district at least one electronic or written 3 publication with nationwide circulation that is recognized for 4 providing information regarding the sale of public bonds or 5 in a newspaper located in the county or a county contiguous 6 to the place of sale . This paragraph does not apply to the 7 refinancing of bonds. 8 DIVISION V 9 OPEN ENROLLMENT 10 Sec. 18. Section 282.18, subsection 17, Code 2026, is 11 amended by striking the subsection. 12 Sec. 19. APPLICABILITY. This division of this Act applies 13 to applications and notifications related to open enrollment 14 submitted under section 282.18 on or after the effective date 15 of this division of this Act. 16 DIVISION VI 17 COUNTY CONFERENCE BOARD 18 Sec. 20. Section 441.2, Code 2026, is amended to read as 19 follows: 20 441.2 Conference board. 21 In each county and each city having an assessor there 22 shall be established a conference board. In counties the 23 conference board shall consist of the mayors or a designated 24 member of a city council of all incorporated cities in the 25 county whose property is assessed by the county assessor; one 26 representative from the board of directors of each high school 27 district of containing a high school in the county, who is a 28 resident of the county , said board of directors appointing said 29 representative for a one-year term and notifying the clerk of 30 the conference board as to their representative ; and members 31 of the board of supervisors. In cities having an assessor 32 the conference board shall consist of the members of the city 33 council, school board the board of directors of each school 34 district containing a high school in the city , and county board 35 -11- LSB 6836YC (4) 91 jda/jh 11/ 18 H.F. _____ of supervisors. In the counties the chairperson of the board 1 of supervisors shall act as chairperson of the conference 2 board, in cities having an assessor the mayor of the city 3 council shall act as chairperson of the conference board. In 4 any action taken by the conference board, the mayors of all 5 incorporated cities in the county whose property is assessed 6 by the county assessor shall constitute one voting unit, the 7 members of the city board of education board of directors of 8 each school district containing a high school in the city or 9 one representative from the board of directors of each high 10 school district of containing a high school in the county shall 11 constitute one voting unit, the members of the city council 12 shall constitute one voting unit, and the county board of 13 supervisors shall constitute one voting unit, each unit having 14 a single vote and no action shall be valid except by the vote of 15 not less than two out of the three units. In any action taken 16 by the conference board, if a city or a county contains only 17 one school district containing a high school, the members of 18 or the representative of the board of directors of the school 19 district, as applicable, shall constitute one voting unit. 20 The majority vote of the members present of each unit shall 21 determine the vote of the unit. The assessor shall be clerk of 22 the conference board. 23